Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 21
UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO -
UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL - CENTERS

Section

PART 1 UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL

PART 2 SICKLE-CELL ANEMIA TREATMENT
AND RESEARCH CENTER

PART 3 HEMOPHILIA TREATMENT CENTER

PART 4 OPERATION OF
UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL

PART 5 UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO
HOSPITAL AUTHORITY

PART 6 EMPLOYMENT STATUS AND
PENSION STATUS OF
EMPLOYEES OF REORGANIZED
UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL

PART 7 ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE CENTER

PART 8 MEDICATION-ASSISTED TREATMENT (MAT) EXPANSION PILOT PROGRAM

PART 9 REGIONAL HEALTH CONNECTOR WORKFORCE PROGRAM

PART 10 MEDICATION FOR OPIOID USE DISORDER